uz_UZ.aff
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adiganlaringda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 adimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 achi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 asan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 asanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 asanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 asanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averamanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averaman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averamizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averamiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averasizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averadimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averadi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averadilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averadilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermayman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaymanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermayman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaymiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaymizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaymiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaysizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaydilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganmanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganmiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganmizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganmiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergansizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganmanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganmiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganmizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganmiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagansizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaylar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaylarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaylar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardikmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardik-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averarding [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averarding-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardinglarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardinglar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averardilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadikmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadik-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermading [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermading-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadinglarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadinglar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadi-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadilar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadilarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermadilar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandikmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandik-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganding [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 averganding-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandinglarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandinglar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avergandingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandik [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandikmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandik-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganding [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermaganding-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandinglar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandinglarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandinglar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 avermagandingizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 dim/a .
SFX X 0 dik/a .
SFX X 0 ding/a .
SFX X 0 dingiz/a .
SFX X 0 dinglar/a .
SFX X 0 dingizlar/a .
SFX X 0 di/a .
SFX X 0 dilar/a .
SFX X 0 ma/a .
SFX X 0 madim/a .
SFX X 0 madik/a .
SFX X 0 mading/a .
SFX X 0 madingiz/a .
SFX X 0 madinglar/a .
SFX X 0 madingizlar/a .
SFX X 0 madi/a .
SFX X 0 madilar/a .
SFX X 0 ib/bd [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 b/bd [aeiou]
SFX X 0 map/cd .
SFX X 0 may/bd .
SFX X 0 ibgina [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maygina [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdangina [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 bgina [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maygina [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masdangina [aeiou]
SFX X k kkan/e k
SFX X k kmagan/e k
SFX X k kkanmanmi k
SFX X k kkanmanmiki k
SFX X k kkanmizmi k
SFX X k kkanmizmiki k
SFX X k kmaganmanmi k
SFX X k kmaganmanmiki k
SFX X k kmaganmizmi k
SFX X k kmaganmizmiki k
SFX X k kkanmi/f k
SFX X k kmaganmi/f k
SFX X k kkandir/g k
SFX X k kmagandir/g k
SFX X k kkanmikan/h k
SFX X k kmaganmikan/h k
SFX X k kkan/h k
SFX X k kkanni/h k
SFX X k kkanning/h k
SFX X k kkanga/h k
SFX X k kkandan/h k
SFX X k kkanda/h k
SFX X k kkanlik/h k
SFX X k kkanlikni/h k
SFX X k kkanlikning/h k
SFX X k kkanlikga/h k
SFX X k kkanlikdan/h k
SFX X k kkanlikda/h k
SFX X k kmagan/h k
SFX X k kmaganni/h k
SFX X k kmaganning/h k
SFX X k kmaganga/h k
SFX X k kmagandan/h k
SFX X k kmaganda/h k
SFX X k kmaganlik/h k
SFX X k kmaganlikni/h k
SFX X k kmaganlikning/h k
SFX X k kmaganlikga/h k
SFX X k kmaganlikdan/h k
SFX X k kmaganlikda/h k
SFX X q qqan/e q
SFX X q qmagan/e q
SFX X q qqanmanmi q
SFX X q qqanmanmiki q
SFX X q qqanmizmi q
SFX X q qqanmizmiki q
SFX X q qmaganmanmi q
SFX X q qmaganmanmiki q
SFX X q qmaganmizmi q
SFX X q qmaganmizmiki q
SFX X q qqanmi/f q
SFX X q qmaganmi/f q
