uz_UZ.dic
achinish/X
adreslan/X
ajablantir/X
akillat/X
alamlan/X
aliklash/X
almash/X
angillat/X
anqovsirash/X
archit/X
arshinla/X
asabiylash/X
asrattir/X
aviamodellashtir/X
axtartir/X
aylantiril/X
ayriboshla/X
azotlantir/X
badnomlash/X
bahuzurlan/X
baqirish/X
barobarlash/X
battarlash/X
behbehla/X
belash/X
beraver/X
beshovla/X
betoqatlan/X
bezdirtir/X
bigʻbigʻla/X
bildirtir/X
bintlash/X
birlashtir/X
biyronlash/X
boʻgʻiltir/X
boʻkir/X
boʻralan/X
boʻshashtir/X
boʻyat/X
bolalatil/X
boqqizdir/X
boshlattiril/X
bostir/X
bozillat/X
bukil/X
bulgʻash/X
burgʻila/X
buruqsa/X
buydala/X
chagʻchagʻla/X
chalgʻi/X
chandil/X
chapilla/X
chaqirtiraver/X
charlash/X
chavaqlash/X
chayqash/X
chekichlan/X
chetlashtiril/X
chikillat/X
chimla/X
chiqaz/X
chirkinlash/X
chitirlat/X
chizdirtir/X
choʻchi/X
choʻllat/X
choʻqilash/X
choʻzdir/X
chopqillat/X
chuchmallat/X
chuqurlashtiril/X
chuvattir/X
dadillan/X
damlattir/X
darmonlan/X
davolash/X
defoliatsiyala/X
depsin/X
dikirlash/X
dingʻirla/X
diydorlashuv/X
doʻndirish/X
doʻqirla/X
dorila/X
dukillat/X
durustlan/X
egatla/X
ekspozitsiyala/X
elikish/X
emran/X
erinish/X
eshil/X
esna/X
eʼtirozlan/X
farqla/X
foydalanish/X
ganchlamoq-ganchlan/X
gapirtir/X
gazlan/X
gʻajish/X
gʻartilla/X
gʻilaylan/X
gʻingshish/X
gʻitilla/X
gʻoʻrala/X
gʻujmay/X
gidratla/X
gizillat/X
gruzinchala/X
gupgupla/X
guruhla/X
guvra/X
halpilla/X
harakatsizlan/X
havolan/X
hayitlash/X
hidla/X
hiqilla/X
hoʻplat/X
hozirlan/X
hurmatlan/X
ichil/X
iflosla/X
ilakish/X
ilgarilash/X
iljira/X
imzolat/X
ingala/X
inlat/X
internetlashtir/X
irgʻat/X
irkilla/X
ishonil/X
ishshaytir/X
islat/X
itarish/X
ixchamlash/X
izgʻir/X
iztiroblan/X
jagʻirlash/X
jangilla/X
javrattir/X
jihozla/X
jilovlan/X
jimjitlash/X
jirillash/X
jizillat/X
joʻrlash/X
joylantir/X
jurʼatlan/X
kalkala/X
kamsit/X
karsilla/X
kattay/X
kechil/X
kekir/X
kel/X
kerishtir/X
kestirtir/X
kibrlan/X
kinolashtir/X
kirtaytir/X
kiygizdir/X
koagulyatsiyalan/X
koʻkarinqira/X
koʻmdir/X
koʻpaytir/X
koʻrgazil/X
koʻr/X
koksla/X
konkretlash/X
korroziyalantir/X
koyit/X
kuchayt/X
kulaver/X
kurashtir/X
kuttiril/X
kuyun/X
lalayish/X
laʼnatlan/X
lipilla/X
loʻlay/X
lovulla/X
maddala/X
mahalliylashtir/X
manqalan/X
marzala/X
mavjlantiril/X
maymoqlashtir/X
maʼyuslantiril/X
mexanizatsiyalashtiril/X
mijiqlan/X
minalashtiril/X
mingiz/X
miyovlat/X
moʻldirat/X
moʻtadillash/X
moslashtir/X
muayyanlashtir/X
mujassamlantir/X
mulzamlan/X
muqarrarlash/X
mushtla/X
naminqira/X
naʼlla/X
nishonlash/X
normalashtir/X
nurla/X
ochiqlashtir/X
ogʻula/X
oʻgirtiril/X
oʻmartir/X
oʻqil/X
oʻrgattir/X
oʻsallash/X
oʻtkiz/X
oʻylamsira/X
oʻzgartir/X
olmoq-ber/X
opichtir/X
oriyentirla/X
oshirish/X
ovlan/X
ozgʻir/X
parchalan/X
pastlat/X
pichirish/X
pirsillat/X
pixilla/X
poklan/X
poyla/X
qabar/X
qala/X
qanoatsizlan/X
qarichla/X
qatlamla/X
qaygʻur/X
qazgʻoqla/X
qilpilla/X
qirqtir/X
qitmirlan/X
qiyral/X
qochirtir/X
qoʻportir/X
qoʻzgʻat/X
qontalash/X
qoril/X
quchoqlash/X
qumlat/X
quruqlan/X
quvlat/X
radiolashtir/X
ratsionallashtir/X
rivojlantiril/X
saflash/X
sandirangla/X
sargʻaytir/X
sayozlash/X
sentrlat/X
sevin/X
shaldira/X
shaqirlash/X
shaytonlan/X
shilpilla/X
shipshipla/X
shnurlan/X
shoshqaloqla/X
shuvattir/X
silkila/X
singish/X
sirgʻantir/X
siylan/X
sochil/X
soʻldiril/X
soʻr/X
sotish/X
standartlash/X
supurgiz/X
surkal/X
suvsat/X
suyutil/X
takabburlan/X
taltanglat/X
tanishish/X
taqillat/X
tarashlan/X
tartibsizlan/X
tashvishlan/X
tayantiril/X
taʼrifla/X
tekkiz/X
tepkila/X
tevarakla/X
tikkaytir/X
tilsizlan/X
tinittir/X
tirgakla/X
tirqirash/X
titrat/X
toʻdalan/X
toʻldirtir/X
toʻnka/X
toʻqmoqlan/X
toʻyintir/X
tomgʻiz/X
toray/X
toygʻanish/X
tugʻdir/X
tupukla/X
turttir/X
tutil/X
tuzlan/X
uchuqlan/X
uloqtiril/X
unutil/X
urushtir/X
uvushtir/X
uyqusirash/X
vadavanglash/X
vangillat/X
vidolash/X
votvotla/X
xashakla/X
xillashtiril/X
xixxixla/X
xomakla/X
xurujlan/X
yalash/X
yamat/X
yarattir/X
yashiril/X
yechintiril/X
yemiril/X
yetish/X
yigitlan/X
yodlayver/X
yoʻndir/X
yolgʻonla/X
yopil/X
yorishtir/X
yotsira/X
yozol/X
yul/X
yuqorilash/X
yuvish/X
zanjirlat/X
zichlashtir/X
zoʻray/X
